District of Columbia statutes.
31-3201

Standardized uniform health insurance claims forms.

(a)

The HCFA 1500 and UB 92 claims forms, or their successor forms as they may be amended from time to time, shall serve as the official health insurance claims forms of the District of Columbia for hospitals and other medical providers and governmental agencies, and such forms shall be used and exclusively accepted by all insurers, including health maintenance organizations and other forms of managed care, transacting health insurance, providing medical insurance through a personal automobile policy, workers’ compensation, or otherwise providing coverage for medical services, and by all hospitals, medical providers, and government agencies in the District of Columbia that require insurance claim forms for their records.

(b)

The claims forms specified in subsection (a) of this section may be modified as necessary to accommodate the transmission and administration of claims by electronic means.

History

Feb. 27, 1996, D.C. Law 11-89, § 2, 42 DCR 7153

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-2331.